District of Columbia statutes.
3-1355

Annual audit and report.

Beginning in 2008, the Commission shall provide an annual report to the Mayor and the Council by November 30th of each year. The report shall include a description of the Commission’s activities for the prior fiscal year and a financial statement relating to the activities and business of the Commission during the preceding fiscal year certified as to its accuracy by an independent auditor.

July 18, 2008, D.C. Law 17-197, § 6, 55 DCR 6277

History